Rhode Island statutes. Title 39 Public Utilities and Carriers
Chapter 5 Appeals

39-5-1.
Judicial review.

Any person aggrieved by a decision or order of the commission may, within seven (7) days from the date of the decision or order, petition the supreme court for a writ of certiorari to review the legality and reasonableness of the decision or order. The petition for a writ of certiorari shall fully set forth the specific reasons for which it is claimed that the decision or order is unlawful or unreasonable. Chapter 35 of title 42 shall not be applicable to appeals from the commission. The procedure established by this chapter shall constitute the exclusive remedy for persons and companies aggrieved by any order or judgment of the commission; provided, however, any person aggrieved by a final decision or order of the administrator may appeal therefrom to the superior court pursuant to the provisions of §

42-35-15

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1912, ch. 795, § 34; G.L. 1923, ch. 253, § 34; G.L. 1938, ch. 122, § 31; P.L. 1949, ch. 2174, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

39-5-1

; impl. am. P.L. 1962, ch. 112; P.L. 1969, ch. 240, § 8; P.L. 1973, ch. 199, § 4.

Division.

Once the commission has made its decision, it is inappropriate for the division and its administrator to challenge that decision, even when the administrator (chairman) has dissented. Providence Gas Co. v. Burke, 419 A.2d 263,

1980 R.I. LEXIS 1797

(R.I. 1980).

39-5-2.
Procedure in supreme court.

Upon the filing of a proper petition for a writ of certiorari for review in the office of the clerk of the supreme court, the supreme court shall cause to be issued a writ of certiorari to the commission which shall require the commission within thirty (30) days to certify to the court a transcript of the evidence, a complete record of the hearing, and a copy of the decision or order of the commission. The clerk of the supreme court shall issue citations to all parties in interest, including the public utilities administrator, returnable at such time as in the discretion of the court shall be proper, and the court as soon as may be thereafter shall hear and determine the matter. The transcript of the testimony before the commission in the case, duly certified by the stenographer taking the testimony, and allowed by one of the commissioners, shall be admitted as testimony before the supreme court.

History of Section.

P.L. 1969, ch. 240, § 8.

Parties.

This section suggests that the division of public utilities and carriers’ party-like posture, assumed on behalf of the public in public utilities commission hearings, must be carried through to the appellate level. Narragansett Elec. Co. v. Harsch,

117 R.I. 395

, 368 A.2d 1194,

1977 R.I. LEXIS 1707

(1977).

39-5-3.
Findings of commission.

The findings of the commission on questions of fact shall be held to be prima facie true and as found by the commission, and the supreme court shall not exercise its independent judgment nor weigh conflicting evidence. An order or judgment of the commission made in the exercise of administrative discretion shall not be reversed unless the commission exceeded its authority or acted illegally, arbitrarily, or unreasonably.

History of Section.

P.L. 1969, ch. 240, § 8.

39-5-4.
Powers of supreme court.

The supreme court may reverse or affirm the judgments and orders of the commission and may remand a cause to it with such mandates as law or equity shall require; and the commission shall enter judgment or order in accordance with the mandates. The transfer of the cause to the supreme court shall not vacate or operate as a stay of any judgment or order of the commission, but the supreme court, or when not in session, a justice thereof, upon notice to interested parties, may suspend execution of the same with or without terms or conditions as justice and equity require; provided, however, that the execution of rate orders shall not be suspended at the request of a utility company unless the company files with the commission a bond running to the commission in an amount and with sureties approved by the court or a justice thereof conditioned that, within thirty (30) days after the termination of the proceedings, the company shall repay to the persons from whom collected, from and after the effective date of the commission’s final order, all sums in excess of the rates finally determined to be just and reasonable.

History of Section.

P.L. 1912, ch. 795, § 35; G.L. 1923, ch. 253, § 35; G.L. 1938, ch. 122, § 32; G.L. 1938, ch. 122, § 31; P.L. 1949, ch. 2174, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

39-5-4

; P.L. 1969, ch. 240, § 8.

39-5-5.
Discovery of new evidence.

If after appeal has been taken to the supreme court, new evidence shall be discovered by any party, an affidavit setting forth the newly discovered evidence shall be filed in the supreme court, and if that court finds the newly discovered evidence to be of such character and sufficient importance to warrant reconsideration of the matter by the commission, the clerk of the supreme court shall transmit a copy of the affidavit to the commission for further consideration, and the court shall stay further proceedings in the supreme court for such time as it shall deem proper. The commission upon receiving the new evidence may confirm, alter, amend, rescind, or reverse the judgment or order which was appealed, and shall report its action to the court forthwith transmitting therewith a transcript of the new testimony. If the commission rescinds or reverses its prior judgment or order, the appeal shall be dismissed. If the prior order or judgment is confirmed, or if it is altered or amended, the altered or amended judgment or order shall be substituted for the original order or judgment, and the proceedings in the supreme court shall continue accordingly.

History of Section.

P.L. 1969, ch. 240, § 8; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 108.